src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON PlainNouns


1/16-finaal+N:1/16-fin˘aal TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
1/2-finaal+N:1/2-fin˘aal TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
1/4-finaal+N:1/4-fin˘aal TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
1/8-finaal+N:1/8-fin˘aal TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
Eestimaa=rahvas+N:Eesti%#maa=r˘ahva KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Single@aabe+N:@P.Stem.Single@˘aaP2e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
aabits+N:aabits MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
aabitsajünger+N:aabitsa%#j˘ünger%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
aabitsajüts+N:aabitsa%#j˘ütʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
aabitsaraamat+N:aabitsa%#raamat VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aabitsatarkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@aabitsa%#t˘arkus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
aabitsatõde+N:aabitsa%#tõD1e KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
aadamaõun+N:˘aadama%#˘õun%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
aadamaülikond+N:˘aadama%#ˈülik˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@aade+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@˘aaT2e PINGE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aadel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aadel%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 8 " ; 
aadelkond+N:˘aadelk˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aader+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aader%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
aadlidaam+N:˘aadli%#d˘aam TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aadlik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aadl˘ik ÄMBLIK  "weight: 8 " ; 
aadlimees+N:˘aadli%#me MEES  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aadliseisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aadli%#s˘eisus SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aadress+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aadr˘esʲs TAUD  "weight: 7 " ; 
aafriklane+N:aafriklane OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
aafriklanna+N:aafriklanna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aagenpits+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ˈaagenp˘itʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aaker+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aaker%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
aaloe+N:˘aal˘oe ARMEE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@D.Case.Nom@@D.Stem.Guessed@@D.Case.Nom@aam+N:@D.Case.Nom@@D.Stem.Guessed@@D.Case.Nom@˘aam TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aamen+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aamen REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
aamissepp+N:aamis%#s˘epp%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
aampalk+N:˘aam%#p˘alʲk TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
aanispits+N:aanʲis%#p˘itʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
aapestik+N:˘aapest˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Stem.Single@aar+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Stem.Single@˘aar TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Single@aara+N:@P.Stem.Single@aara PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
aardekütt+N:˘aarde%#k˘ütʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
aardla+N:˘aardla AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@aare+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@˘aarD1e PINGE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@aaria+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@˘aaria AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
aarialane+N:˘aarialane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Stem.Nom@aas+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Stem.Nom@˘aas%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 8 " ; 
aasialane+N:˘aasialane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
aasimine+N:˘aasʲimine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
aasta+N:˘aasta AASTA  "weight: 3 " ; 
aastaaeg+N:˘aasta%#˘aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 8 " ; 
aastaarv+N:˘aasta%#˘arv%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 9 " ; 
aastaeelarve+N:˘aasta%#˘eel%#˘arve PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
aastakäik+N:˘aasta%#k˘äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 9 " ; 
aastakäive+N:˘aasta%#k˘äiB2e PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
aastakümme+N:˘aasta%#kümmE2 SEEME  "weight: 7 " ; 
aastalehm+N:˘aasta%#l˘ehm%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
aastalõpp+N:˘aasta%#l˘õpp%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 10 " ; 
aastamaks+N:˘aasta%#m˘aks%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
aastamakse+N:˘aasta%#m˘akse PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
aastamiljon+N:˘aasta%#m˘ilʲjon REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
aastanumber+N:˘aasta%#n˘umber%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aastanäitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aasta%#n˘äitus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
aastapalk+N:˘aasta%#p˘alk%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
aastaplaan+N:˘aasta%#pl˘aanʲ TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
aastapreemia+N:˘aasta%#pr˘eemia AASTA  "weight: 9 " ; 
aastapäev+N:˘aasta%#p˘äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 8 " ; 
aastapäevakõne+N:˘aasta%#päeva%#kõne PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aastapäevaüritus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aasta%#päeva%#üritus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
aastaring+N:˘aasta%#r˘ing TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
aastarõngas+N:˘aasta%#r˘õnga KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
aastasada+N:˘aasta%#saJ1D1a%>%{pl.u%} SADA  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Single@aastatetagune+N:@P.Stem.Single@˘aastate%#tagune SOOLANE  "weight: 10 " ; 
aastatuhat+N:˘aasta%#tuha TUHAT  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aastavahetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aasta%#vahetus OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
aateinimene+N:˘aate%#inimene OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
aatekaaslane+N:˘aate%#k˘aaslane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aatelisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aatelisus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
aatemees+N:˘aate%#me MEES  "weight: 11 " ; 
aatleja+N:˘aatleja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aatom+N:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aatom REDEL  "weight: 8 " ; 
aatomienergia+N:˘aatomi%#en˘ergia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
aatomipomm+N:˘aatomi%#p˘omm TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
aatomisõda+N:˘aatomi%#sõJ1D1a%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
aatomkütus+N:˘aatom%#kütus SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
aatrium+N:˘aatrium MUUSEUM  "weight: 11 " ; 
aažio+N:˘aažio AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
abajas+N:abaja LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
abakala+N:aba%#kala%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@abakus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abakus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
abaluu+N:aba%#l˘uu%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@abasiin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abas˘iin TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@abažuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ˈabaž˘uur TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@abdoomen+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abd˘oomen REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Single@abee+N:@P.Stem.Single@ab˘ee%>%{id%}%{rare%} ARMEE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aberratsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@aberratsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
abessiinlane+N:abess˘iinlane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
abessiinlanna+N:abessiinlanna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@abessiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ˈabess˘iiv TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@abhaas+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abh˘aas TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@abi+N:@D.Stem.Guessed@abi%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 5 " ; 
abiandja+N:abi%#˘anʲdja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
abiandmine+N:abi%#˘andmine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
abidirektor+N:abi%#dir˘ektor REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
abiellumine+N:abi%#˘ellumine OLULINE  "weight: 8 " ; 
abiellumisettepanek+N:abi%#˘ellumis%#˘ette%#panek VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@abiellumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abi%#˘ellumus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
abielu+N:abi%#elu%{stemill%} KAVA  "weight: 6 " ; 
abieluettepanek+N:abi%#elu%#˘ette%#panek VIRSIK  "weight: 10 " ; 
abieluinimene+N:abi%#elu%#inimene OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@abielulahutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abi%#elu%#lahutus OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
abielulaps+N:abi%#elu%#l˘aP1s LAPS  "weight: 11 " ; 
abielumees+N:abi%#elu%#me MEES  "weight: 9 " ; 
abielunaine+N:abi%#elu%#naine NAINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
abielupaar+N:abi%#elu%#p˘aar TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
abielupool+N:abi%#elu%#p˘ool%{stemill%} KEEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
abielurahvas+N:abi%#elu%#r˘ahva KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
abielurikkuja+N:abi%#elu%#r˘ikkuja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
abielusadam+N:abi%#elu%#sadam MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@abieluseisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abi%#elu%#s˘eisus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
abieluside+N:abi%#elu%#side HAARE  "weight: 11 " ; 
abielusõrmus+N:abi%#elu%#sõrmus SOOLANE  "weight: 10 " ; 
abieluvoodi+N:abi%#elu%#v˘oodʲi AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
abieluõnn+N:abi%#elu%#˘õnʲn%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT  "weight: 11 " ; 
abikaasa+N:abi%#kaasa PERE  "weight: 6 " ; 
abikaaslane+N:abi%#k˘aaslane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
abikomissar+N:abi%#komissar TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
abiksolija+N:abiks%#olija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
abiline+N:abiline OLULINE  "weight: 7 " ; 
abilinnapea+N:abi%#linna%#p˘E6A6%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 7 " ; 
abimaavanem+N:abi%#m˘aa%#vanem MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
abimaterjal+N:abi%#materjal TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
abimees+N:abi%#me MEES  "weight: 9 " ; 
abinõu+N:abi%#n˘õu KAVA  "weight: 8 " ; 
abiogenees+N:abio%#gen˘ees TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@abioos+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abi˘oos TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
abiotsija+N:abi%#˘otʲsija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
abipakett+N:abi%#pak˘etʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
abipaluja+N:abi%#paluja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
abipalve+N:abi%#p˘alve PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
